Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-135.01
Utility-type vehicle, defined.

(1) Utility-type vehicle means any motorized off-highway device which (a) is seventy-four inches in width or less, (b) is not more than one hundred eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, and (c) travels on four or more nonhighway tires.

(2) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf car vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.

Laws 2010, LB650, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB223, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB814, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB98, § 2.